Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0863.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
PART 1
LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the department of
agriculture and rural development for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2027, from the following funds:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT
APPROPRIATION SUMMARY
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


Full-time equated classified positions 545.0
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 157,047,700
Total interdepartmental grants and
intradepartmental transfers 338,600
ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 156,709,100
Federal revenues:
Total federal revenues 20,245,000
Special revenue funds:
Total local revenues 0
Total private revenues 0
Total other state restricted revenues 59,563,700
State general fund/general purpose $ 76,900,400
Sec. 102. DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND
SUPPORT
Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0
Full-time equated classified positions 31.0
Unclassified salaries--FTE positions 6.0 $ 1,096,200
Accounting service center 1,206,700
Commissions and boards 23,800
Emergency management--FTEs 8.0 2,799,700
Emerging contaminants in food and agriculture--
FTEs 6.0 1,368,700
Executive direction--FTEs 17.0 2,549,600
Property management 953,200
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,997,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
Deferred federal revenue funding 15,000
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


HHS, multiple grants 450,200
USDA, multiple grants 600,000
Special revenue funds:
Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 86,500
Dairy and food safety fund 321,100
Feed control fund 600
Freshwater protection fund 52,600
Gasoline inspection and testing fund 102,500
Industry support funds 58,300
Michigan craft beverage council fund 8,800
Private forestland enhancement fund 19,600
State general fund/general purpose $ 8,282,700
Sec. 103. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
Information technology services and projects $ 2,832,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,832,300
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 84,600
Dairy and food safety fund 294,500
Feed control fund 20,200
Fertilizer control fund 200
Freshwater protection fund 40,100
Gasoline inspection and testing fund 119,700
Industrial hemp fund 15,000
Weights and measures regulation fees 100,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 2,158,000
Sec. 104. FOOD SAFETY AND ANIMAL HEALTH
Full-time equated classified positions 212.0
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


Animal disease prevention and response--FTEs 63.0 $ 11,360,700
Animal feed safety--FTEs 10.0 2,165,200
Food safety and quality assurance--FTEs 103.0 18,656,600
Indemnification - livestock depredation 15,000
Milk safety and quality assurance--FTEs 36.0 6,160,700
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 38,358,200
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
HHS, multiple grants 2,952,100
USDA, multiple grants 1,211,300
Special revenue funds:
Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 89,800
Animal welfare fund 150,000
Consumer and industry food safety education
fund 242,500
Dairy and food safety fund 9,186,500
Feed control fund 1,478,300
Industry food safety education fund 114,100
Marihuana regulatory fund 50,500
State general fund/general purpose $ 22,883,100
Sec. 105. ENVIRONMENT AND SUSTAINABILITY
Full-time equated classified positions 117.5
Environmental stewardship - MAEAP--FTEs 27.0 $ 11,175,800
Local conservation districts 3,000,000
Pesticide and plant pest management--FTEs 79.0 14,032,100
Right-to-farm--FTEs 6.5 1,073,500
Soil health/regenerative agriculture--FTEs 5.0 2,066,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 31,347,400
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
IDG from MDEGLE, biosolids 97,800
Federal revenues:
Department of interior 96,300
EPA, multiple grants 1,093,100
USDA, multiple grants 2,199,900
Special revenue funds:
Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 4,110,900
Fertilizer control fund 1,417,800
Freshwater protection fund 8,600,600
Horticulture fund 70,000
Industrial hemp fund 592,300
Industry support funds 228,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 12,840,600
Sec. 106. AGRICULTURE DEVELOPMENT
Full-time equated classified positions 71.0
Agricultural preservation easement grants $ 1,900,000
Agricultural support--FTEs 5.0 919,900
Agriculture development--FTEs 16.0 4,927,800
Farm to family--FTEs 6.0 3,021,100
Farmland and open space preservation--FTEs 10.0 1,639,800
Food and agriculture investment program 2,449,300
Food and agriculture supply chain--FTE 1.0 305,000
Fruit and vegetable inspections--FTEs 8.0 1,330,400
Intercounty drain--FTEs 5.0 910,700
Michigan craft beverage council--FTE 1.0 1,353,000
Migrant labor housing--FTEs 9.0 1,433,500
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


Michigan local food, farm, and nutrition
programs 8,000,000
Producer security/grain dealers--FTEs 6.0 1,059,800
Qualified forest program--FTEs 4.0 8,147,600
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 37,397,900
Appropriated from:
Federal revenues:
USDA, multiple grants 8,091,600
Special revenue funds:
Agricultural preservation fund 3,539,800
Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 5,100
Commodity inspection fees 708,900
Grain dealers fee fund 897,500
Industry support funds 227,400
Michigan craft beverage council fund 1,323,000
Migratory labor housing fund 147,800
Private forestland enhancement fund 1,380,100
State school aid revenue 4,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 17,076,700
Sec. 107. LABORATORY AND CONSUMER PROTECTION
Full-time equated classified positions 113.5
Consumer protection program--FTEs 39.0 $ 7,104,200
Integrated solutions--FTEs 25.0 3,925,400
Laboratory services--FTEs 40.5 8,545,900
USDA monitoring--FTEs 9.0 1,774,300
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 21,349,800
Appropriated from:
Interdepartmental grant revenues:
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


IDG from LARA (LCC), liquor quality testing
fees 240,800
Federal revenues:
EPA, multiple grants 180,600
HHS, multiple grants 1,579,400
USDA, multiple grants 1,775,500
Special revenue funds:
Agriculture licensing and inspection fees 440,000
Agriculture preservation fund 44,600
Dairy and food safety fund 959,800
Feed control fund 157,000
Fertilizer control fund 23,500
Freshwater protection fund 133,800
Gasoline inspection and testing fund 2,281,500
Grain dealers fee fund 8,400
Industrial hemp fund 322,200
Migratory labor housing fund 29,900
Refined petroleum fund 3,620,400
Testing fees 365,000
Weights and measures regulation fees 778,100
State general fund/general purpose $ 8,409,300
Sec. 108. FAIRS AND EXPOSITIONS
County fairs, shows, and expositions $ 250,000
Fairs and racing 376,600
Horse racing advisory commission 125,000
Purses and supplements - fairs/licensed tracks 3,017,600
Standardbred breeders' awards 503,900
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


Standardbred purses and supplements - licensed
tracks 1,441,100
Standardbred sire stakes 1,050,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,764,200
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Agriculture equine industry development fund 6,514,200
State general fund/general purpose $ 250,000
Sec. 109. ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Farmer-owned meat processor grants $ 4,000,000
Michigan animal agriculture alliance 3,000,000
Michigan local food, farm, and nutrition
programs 2,000,000
GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 9,000,000
Appropriated from:
Special revenue funds:
Dairy and food safety fund 4,000,000
State general fund/general purpose $ 5,000,000

PART 2
PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS
FOR FISCAL YEAR 2026-2027
GENERAL SECTIONS
Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027, total state spending under part 1 from state sources is
$136,464,100.00 and total state spending under part 1 from state
sources to be paid to local units of government is $11,800,000.00.
The following itemized statement identifies appropriations from
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


which spending to local units of government will occur:
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT
Agriculture preservation easement grants $ 1,900,000
Environmental stewardship/MAEAP 4,100,000
Local conservation districts 3,000,000
Qualified forest program 1,400,000
Rural development fund grant program 1,400,000
TOTAL $ 11,800,000
Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are
subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101
to 18.1594.
Sec. 203. As used in part 1 and this part:
(a) "Department" means the department of agriculture and rural
development.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department.
(c) "Fiscal agencies" means the Michigan house fiscal agency
and the Michigan senate fiscal agency.
(d) "FTE" means full-time equated.
(e) "IDG" means interdepartmental grant.
(f) "MAEAP" means the Michigan agriculture environmental
assurance program.
(g) "MDEGLE" means the Michigan department of environment,
Great Lakes, and energy.
(h) "Standard report recipients" means the house and senate
appropriations subcommittees on agriculture and rural development,
the house and senate fiscal agencies, the house and senate policy
offices, and the state budget office.
(i) "Subcommittees" means all members of the subcommittees of
the house and senate appropriations committees with jurisdiction
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


over the budget for the department.
(j) "TB" means tuberculosis.
(k) "USDA" means the United States Department of Agriculture.
Sec. 204. A department or agency shall use the internet to
fulfill the reporting requirements of this part and shall make each
report readily accessible to the public and conspicuously post each
required report in a single archivable location on the department's
or agency's Michigan.gov website not later than the due date
required for each report. In addition to placing all reports
required in the current fiscal year on the department's or agency's
website, the department or agency shall maintain on its website all
reports placed on the website from previous fiscal years posted by
fiscal year in the same single archivable location. The department
or agency shall also transmit all required reports for the current
fiscal year to the standard recipients and any other required
recipients by email.
Sec. 205. To the extent permissible under section 261 of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1261, all of the
following apply to the expenditure of funds appropriated in part 1:
(a) The funds must not be used for the purchase of foreign
goods or services, or both, if competitively priced and of
comparable quality American goods or services, or both, are
available.
(b) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses, if they are
competitively priced and of comparable quality.
(c) Preference must be given to goods or services, or both,
that are manufactured or provided by Michigan businesses owned and
operated by veterans, if they are competitively priced and of
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


comparable quality.
Sec. 206. The department shall not take disciplinary action
against an employee of the department because the employee
communicates with a member of the legislature or legislative staff,
unless the communication is prohibited by law and the department is
exercising its authority as provided by law.
Sec. 207. Consistent with section 217 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1217, each department and agency
receiving appropriations in part 1 shall prepare a report on out-
of-state travel expenses not later than January 1. The report must
list all travel by classified and unclassified employees outside
this state in the previous fiscal year that was funded in whole or
in part with funds appropriated in the department's or agency's
budget. The department shall submit the report to the standard
report recipients and to the house and senate appropriations
committees. The report must include all of the following
information:
(a) The dates of each travel occurrence.
(b) The total transportation and related costs of each travel
occurrence and the proportions funded with state general
fund/general purpose revenues, state restricted revenues, federal
revenues, local revenues, and other revenues.
Sec. 208. If the state administrative board, acting under
section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount
appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent
resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and
serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the
particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution.
Sec. 209. Not later than December 15, the state budget office
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


shall prepare and submit a report that provides estimates of the
total general fund/general purpose appropriation lapses at the
close of the previous fiscal year. The report must summarize the
projected year-end general fund/general purpose appropriation
lapses by major departmental program or program areas. The state
budget office shall submit the report to the standard report
recipients and to the chairpersons of the house and senate
appropriations committees.
Sec. 210. (1) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1,
there is appropriated an amount not to exceed $3,000,000.00 for
federal contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not
available for expenditure until they have been transferred to
another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(2) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $2,000,000.00 for state
restricted contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not
available for expenditure until they have been transferred to
another line item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management
and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for local
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available
for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line
item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
(4) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, there is
appropriated an amount not to exceed $100,000.00 for private
contingency authorization. Amounts appropriated are not available
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


for expenditure until they have been transferred to another line
item in part 1 under section 393(2) of the management and budget
act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1393.
Sec. 211. The department shall cooperate with the department
of technology, management, and budget to maintain a searchable
website accessible by the public at no cost that includes, but is
not limited to, all of the following for the department:
(a) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by category.
(b) Fiscal year-to-date expenditures by appropriation unit.
(c) Fiscal year-to-date payments to a selected vendor,
including the vendor name, payment date, payment amount, and
payment description.
Sec. 212. Not later than 14 days after the release of the
executive budget recommendation, the department shall cooperate
with the state budget office to provide an annual report on
estimated state restricted fund balances, state restricted fund
projected revenues, and state restricted fund expenditures for the
previous 2 fiscal years. The report must be submitted to the
standard report recipients and to the chairpersons of the house and
senate appropriations committees.
Sec. 213. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to
restrict or impede a marginalized community's access to government
resources, programs, or facilities.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, local governments
shall report any action or policy that attempts to restrict or
interfere with the duties of the local health officer.
Sec. 214. To the extent permissible under the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594, the director of
each department or agency receiving appropriations in part 1, shall
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


take all reasonable steps to ensure geographically disadvantaged
business enterprises compete for and perform contracts to provide
services or supplies, or both. The director shall strongly
encourage firms with which the department contracts to subcontract
with certified geographically disadvantaged business enterprises
for services, supplies, or both. As used in this section,
"geographically disadvantaged business enterprises" means that term
as defined in Executive Directive No. 2023-1.
Sec. 215. On a quarterly basis, the department or agency
receiving appropriations in part 1, shall report on the number of
full-time equated positions in pay status by civil service
classification, including a comparison by line item of the number
of full-time equated positions authorized from funds appropriated
in part 1 to the actual number of full-time equated positions
employed by the department at the end of the reporting period. The
report must be submitted to the house and senate appropriations
committees and to the standard report recipients.
Sec. 216. (1) The department shall maximize utilization of its
in-person state workforce. The department shall prioritize
occupancy utilization of office space for each division within the
department. Employees with job responsibilities that require the
employees to serve in their capacities outside of an office shall
be monitored each pay period to ensure all work hours reported on
the timesheet were actually worked.
(2) The department shall comply with requirements set forth by
the office of the state employer on in-person work and utilization
and occupancy rates of state buildings to ensure in-person work is
optimized and occupancy rates are 80% or higher, subject to market
conditions.
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


(3) The department shall adhere to civil service rules and
regulations that state the standard biweekly work period for a
full-time employee in the classified service of this state is the
equivalent of 80 hours of work. The department shall establish
policies and processes to ensure all employees are working their
jobs during agreed-upon business hours.
Sec. 218. (1) In addition to any other requirements under this
part, if the department is authorized under this part to expend
funds in addition to those appropriated in part 1, the department
must do all of the following:
(a) Not later than November 1, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office that
details all of the following:
(i) The type of funding received during the previous fiscal
year that was authorized in part 2 of the article that made
appropriations for the department in the previous fiscal year.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
(iv) How much of the funding was spent and for what purpose or
purposes.
(b) Not later than 60 days after receipt of funds authorized
under this part, provide a report to the chairpersons of the house
and senate appropriations committees, the house and senate fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office that details all of the
following:
(i) The type of funding received.
(ii) When the funding was received.
(iii) The amount of funding received.
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


(iv) The anticipated or actual amount to be spent and the
specified purpose or purposes.
(c) Not later than February 15, provide a report to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees, the
house and senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget office with
an estimate of funding authorized by this part that the department
anticipates it will receive in the subsequent fiscal year,
identifying all of the following:
(i) The type or types of funding anticipated.
(ii) The amount or amounts of funding anticipated.
(iii) The purpose or purposes of the funding.
(2) If another reporting requirement under this part would
provide substantially similar information on a substantially
similar timeframe as would be reported under subsection (1),
subsection (1) does not apply.
Sec. 219. The department shall receive and retain copies of
all reports funded from appropriations in part 1. The department
shall follow federal and state law and guidelines for short-term
and long-term retention of records. The department may
electronically retain copies of reports unless otherwise required
by federal and state guidelines.
Sec. 221. To the extent possible, the department shall not
expend appropriations under part 1 until all existing authorized
work project funds available for the same purposes are exhausted.
Sec. 222. Not later than 6 months after the state budget
office issues work project letters, a department or agency shall
submit an annual report that summarizes all work project accounts.
The report must include all of the following:
(a) A list of all work project accounts.
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


(b) The status of all work project accounts, including amounts
expended, amounts encumbered, and available balances for each
account.
(c) The amount of funds that lapsed from any previously
designated work project accounts, the name and description of the
work project account, and the funds that received the lapsed
amounts.
Sec. 224. Not later than April 1, the department shall report
on each specific policy change made to implement a public act
affecting the department that took effect during the previous
calendar year. The report must include reference to the public act
number. The department shall submit the report to the standard
report recipients, the house and senate appropriations committees,
and the joint committee on administrative rules.
Sec. 229. The department must provide an annual report to the
standard report recipients detailing significant federal policy
changes that do, or are expected to, significantly impact the
operations of the department, including reductions in federal
revenue and/or changes that are likely to lead to a reduction in
the department's ability to safeguard the health or welfare of the
public.
Sec. 234. Total authorized appropriations from all sources
under part 1 for legacy costs for the fiscal year ending September
30, 2027 are estimated at $6,633,500.00. From this amount, total
appropriations for pension-related legacy costs for the department
are estimated at $6,633,500.00. Total appropriations for retiree
health care legacy costs for the department are estimated at $0.00.
Sec. 235. Not later than April 1, the department shall provide
to the standard report recipients a copy of its annual strategic
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


plan prepared in compliance with section 363 of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1363. The plan must include the
mission, vision, goals, strategies, and performance measures of the
department.
Sec. 236. The department shall report on any court settlement
that may require further legislative review of state statutory
programs or regulations.
Sec. 237. Not later than November 15, the department shall
disclose on a publicly accessible website private and other third-
party funds received by the department in the previous fiscal year.
The report must include the amount of funding received, the
specific source of funding received, the purpose for which funding
was expended, and the amount of any remaining funds. The report
must be submitted to the standard report recipients and to the
chairpersons of the house and senate appropriations committees.
Sec. 239. (1) Within 30 days of enactment of this act, the
house and senate shall provide to the state budget office a
jointly-agreed-upon list of legislatively directed spending items
funded in part 1 as defined in 2025 PA 32 and 2025 PA 33. The list
must include all information and documents pertaining to the funded
items as publicly disclosed in accordance with 2025 PA 32 and 2025
PA 33.
(2) In accordance with section 364(4) of the management and
budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1364, the department or agency
administering the grant shall post a report in a publicly
accessible location on its website beginning March 15 of the
current fiscal year. The department or agency shall update the
report and shall post an updated report not later than June 15 of
the current fiscal year and again not later than September 15 of
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


the current fiscal year. The department shall include in the report
the most comprehensive information the department has available at
the time of posting for grants awarded.
Sec. 240. The state budget director shall take steps to ensure
that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state under
the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. Any state fiscal
recovery funds that would otherwise lapse after September 30, 2026
are automatically reappropriated for the same purpose as originally
authorized and available for expenditure through December 31, 2026
and any subsequent financial closeout period.
Sec. 241. (1) The state budget director shall take steps to
ensure that all state fiscal recovery funds allocated to this state
under the American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, are
expended by December 31, 2026, as required by law. The state budget
director may reallocate appropriated funds for the purpose of fully
utilizing state fiscal recovery funds that are in jeopardy of not
meeting the expenditure deadline for reasons that may include, but
are not limited to, completed projects coming in under budget or
funds unable to be fully used by subrecipients. The state budget
director shall reallocate any of the funds reallocated under this
subsection to the programs or purposes specified in this section.
Any funds reallocated are unappropriated and immediately
reappropriated for the following purposes:
(a) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
safety employees at the department of corrections.
(b) To reclassify general fund/general purpose appropriations
for payroll and covered benefits for eligible public health and
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


safety employees at the department of state police.
(2) All applicable guidance, implementation, and reporting
provisions of American rescue plan act of 2021, Public Law 117-2,
must be followed for state fiscal recovery funds reallocated and
reappropriated under subsection (1).
(3) The state budget director shall notify the senate and the
house appropriations committees not later than 1 business day after
making any reallocations under subsection (1). The notification
must include the authorized program under which funds were
originally appropriated, the amount of the reallocation, the
program, or programs, or purpose, and the department to which the
funds are being reallocated under subsection (1), and the amount
reallocated to each program or purpose.

DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
Sec. 301. (1) The department may establish a fee schedule and
collect fees for the following work activities and services:
(a) Pesticide and plant pest management propagation and
certification of virus-free foundation stock.
(b) Fruit and vegetable inspection and grading services at
shipping and termination points and processing plants.
(c) Laboratory support analyses of food, livestock, and
agricultural products for disease, foreign products for disease,
toxic materials, foreign substances, and quality standards.
(d) Laboratory support test samples for other state and local
agencies and public or private organizations.
(2) The department may receive and expend revenue from the
fees authorized under subsection (1), subject to appropriation, to
recover expenses associated with the work activities and services
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


described in subsection (1). Fee revenue collected by the
department under subsection (1) does not lapse to the state general
fund at the end of the fiscal year but carries forward for
appropriation by the legislature in the subsequent fiscal year.
(3) The department shall notify the subcommittees, the fiscal
agencies, and the state budget office 30 days before proposing
changes in fees authorized under this section or under section 5 of
1915 PA 91, MCL 285.35.
(4) On or before February 1 of each year, the department shall
provide a report to the subcommittees, the fiscal agencies, and the
state budget office detailing all the fees charged by the
department under the authorization provided in this section,
including, but not limited to, rates, number of individuals paying
each fee, and the revenue generated by each fee in the previous
fiscal year.
Sec. 302. (1) The department may contract with or provide
grants to local units of government, institutions of higher
education, or nonprofit organizations to support activities
authorized by appropriations in part 1.
(2) The department shall notify members of the legislature of
grants or contracts awarded to recipients located within a member's
legislative district.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) "Contracts" includes, but is not limited to, contracts for
delivery of groundwater/freshwater programs, MAEAP technical
assistance, forest management, invasive species monitoring, and
wildlife risk mitigation.
(b) "Grants" includes, but is not limited to, grants promoting
proper pesticide disposal and research grants for the purpose of
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


enhancing the agricultural industries in this state.
Sec. 303. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
emerging contaminants in food and agriculture the department shall
support efforts to identify and respond to the impacts of emerging
contaminants to the food and agriculture sector, help address and
mitigate current issues caused by emerging contaminants, and work
to prevent and minimize future impacts. The department shall
coordinate these efforts with other state agencies, federal
agencies, tribal governments, local governments, institutions of
higher learning, and the food and agriculture sector. Emerging
contaminants include but are not limited to pesticides, dioxins,
and per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances.
(2) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for emerging
contaminants in food and agriculture are designated as a work
project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds do
not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for
expenditures for projects under this section until the projects
have been completed. The following is in compliance with section
451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to support efforts to
identify and respond to the impacts of emerging contaminants to the
food and agriculture sector, help address and mitigate current
issues caused by emerging contaminants, and work to prevent and
minimize future impacts.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The estimated cost of this project is $1,368,700.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


September 30, 2031.

BUREAU OF FOOD SAFETY AND ANIMAL HEALTH
Sec. 401. (1) The department shall report on the previous
calendar year's activities of the bureau of food safety and animal
health. The report must include information on activities and
outcomes of the dairy safety and inspection program, the food
safety inspection program, the foodborne illness and emergency
response program, and the food service program.
(2) The report must include information on significant
foodborne outbreaks and emergencies, including any significant
enforcement actions taken related to food safety during the prior
calendar year.
(3) The department shall include in the report all
indemnification payments for livestock depredation made in the
previous calendar year and shall include all of the following:
(a) The reason for the indemnification.
(b) The amount of the indemnification.
(c) The person for whom the indemnification was paid.
(4) The report must be transmitted on or before April 1 of
each year.
Sec. 402. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall pay for all whole herd bovine TB testing costs and
individual animal testing costs in the modified accredited zone and
buffer counties as referenced in the current memorandum of
understanding between the department and the USDA to maintain
split-state status requirements. These costs include indemnity and
compensation for injury causing death or downer to animals.
Sec. 403. The department shall use its resources to
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


collaborate with the USDA to monitor bovine TB, consistent with the
current required memorandum of understanding between the department
and the USDA.
Sec. 404. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for animal
disease prevention and response, the department shall use
$200,000.00 to cover costs associated with testing of registered
privately owned cervid facilities as follows:
(a) Required surveillance testing for chronic wasting disease.
(b) Infected herd bovine TB testing.
Sec. 405. (1) On or before October 15 of each year, the
department shall provide to the standard report recipients a report
on bovine TB status and department activities.
(2) For each fiscal quarter following the report required in
subsection (1), the department shall provide an update. The
quarterly update reports must identify significant impacts to the
program, including new incidence of bovine TB in this state,
department activity associated with specific new incidence of
bovine TB, any changes in USDA requirements or movement orders, and
information and data on wildlife risk mitigation plan
implementation in the modified accredited zone; implementation of a
movement certificate process; progress toward annual surveillance
test requirements; efforts to work with slaughter facilities in
this state, as well as those that slaughter a significant number of
animals from this state; and educational programs and information
for this state's livestock community.
Sec. 406. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for Michigan
animal agriculture alliance, the department shall work with animal
industry representatives and state research universities to
continue an animal research grant program.
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw



BUREAU OF ENVIRONMENT AND SUSTAINABILITY
Sec. 501. The department shall report on the previous calendar
year's activities of the bureau of environment and sustainability
on or before April 1 of each year.
Sec. 502. (1) The purpose of the part 1 appropriation for soil
health/regenerative agriculture is to advance the adoption and
implementation of best regenerative agricultural practices and new
environmentally sustainable technologies, promoting soil health and
regenerative agriculture principles throughout the state.
(2) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for soil
health/regenerative agriculture, the department shall do both of
the following:
(a) Promote the principles of soil health and regenerative
agriculture through at least the following:
(i) The maintenance of soil cover.
(ii) The minimization of soil disturbance.
(iii) The maximization of plant and crop diversity.
(iv) The maximization of the presence of living roots.
(v) The integration of livestock into the cropping systems.
(b) Ensure that program outcomes include at least the
following:
(i) The increase of soil organic matter content.
(ii) The improvement of soil water infiltration capacity.
(iii) The increase in soil water holding capacity.
(iv) The improvement of soil biological capacity to break down
plant residue and other substances and to maintain soil
aggregation.
(v) The improvement of soil nutrient sequestration and cycling
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


capacity.
(vi) The reduction of nutrient losses.
(vii) The increase of carbon sequestration capacity of soil.
(3) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for soil
health/regenerative agriculture, the department shall promote
practices of soil health and regenerative agriculture, including
the use of no-till farming, intercropping, cover crops,
multispecies cover crops, roller crimping, managed rotational
grazing, and other practices identified that utilize natural
biological processes to advance the goals of soil health and
regenerative agriculture.
(4) No funds appropriated in part 1 for soil
health/regenerative agriculture may be used for applied research
into the precision application of fertilizer, pesticides, or
herbicides.
(5) It is the intention of the legislature that the department
engage with program partners to achieve the purposes of the soil
health/regenerative agriculture programs through research,
education, and outreach. Program partners include, but are not
limited to, farmer-to-farmer networks, Michigan State University
Extension, Michigan State University AgBioResearch, the USDA
Natural Resources Conservation Service, local conservation
districts, and other nongovernmental organizations. Agreements with
program partners receiving funds through soil health/regenerative
agriculture appropriations must describe intended outcomes and how
intended outcomes will be measured and require the provision of a
report to the department on uses of funding received and a progress
report on outcomes.
(6) The department may use state employees or contract service
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


providers, or both, to achieve the purposes of the soil
health/regenerative agriculture programs.
(7) In the report required under section 501 of this part, the
department shall provide information on the program described in
this section, including department activities, uses of program
funds by activity or project, contractors, grantees, and a summary
of projects and project results.
(8) Of the funds appropriated in part 1 for soil
health/regenerative agriculture, not less than $1,000,000.00 must
be used by the department to partner with the state land grant
university through MSU Extension and AgBioResearch to develop,
implement, and evaluate a soil health/regenerative agriculture
program. The partnership described in this subsection must be
focused on researching and assisting the agricultural industry in
implementing soil health/regenerative agricultural principles and
techniques.
Sec. 503. Not later than April 1, the department shall prepare
a final report to be posted on the department's website and
provided to the relevant house and senate standing committees and
appropriations subcommittees as well as to the fiscal agencies and
state budget office. The report must contain the following
information for agriculture nutrient best management voluntary
practices program:
(a) The number and location of acres enrolled in nutrient
management or other best management practices.
(b) The number of acres enrolled that were not previously
verified under the MAEAP.
(c) A summary of practices implemented and available incentive
programs.
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


(d) The starting and ending balances of the program.
(e) A summary of outreach and training efforts.
(f) Testing results.
Sec. 505. The funds appropriated in part 1 for environmental
stewardship/MAEAP must be used to support department agriculture
pollution prevention programs, including groundwater and freshwater
protection programs under part 87 of the natural resources and
environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.8701 to
324.8717, and technical assistance in implementing conservation
grants available under the federal farm bill.
Sec. 506. The department may receive and expend federal
revenues up to a total of $1,000,000.00 in excess of the federal
revenue appropriated in part 1 for environmental stewardship and
MAEAP activities. The department shall notify the subcommittees,
the fiscal agencies, and the state budget office prior to expending
federal revenues authorized under this section.
Sec. 507. (1) From the appropriations in part 1 for local
conservation districts, $3,000,000.00 must be distributed through a
grant program to local conservation districts in this state that
were in operation in the previous fiscal year based upon criteria
established by the department.
(2) On or before April 1, the department shall report on the
previous calendar year's activities of local conservation
districts. The report must include descriptions of local
conservation district activities and the use of funding. In
preparing this report, the department shall coordinate with
representatives of local conservation districts.

AGRICULTURE DEVELOPMENT BUREAU
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


Sec. 601. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for the
food and agriculture investment program, the department shall
operate a food and agriculture investment program.
(2) The food and agriculture investment program shall do all
of the following:
(a) Expand the Michigan food and agriculture sector.
(b) Promote food security.
(c) Develop local and regional food systems.
(d) Grow Michigan exports.
(e) Promote the development of value-added agricultural
production.
(f) Support urban farms, food hubs, food incubators, and
community-based processing facilities with a focus on new and
expanding protein processors.
(g) Promote the expansion of farm markets, flower markets, and
urban agriculture, including hoop houses.
(h) Increase food processing activities within this state by
accelerating investment projects and infrastructure development
that support growth in production agriculture and food and
agriculture processing, expand opportunity to new agricultural
producers and processors, promote agriculture tourism and
agricultural heritage, and develop agricultural education and
interpretation activities.
(3) In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department may receive and expend funds received from outside
sources for the food and agriculture investment program.
(4) Before the allocation of funding, all projects must
receive approval from the Michigan commission of agriculture and
rural development, except for projects selected through a
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


competitive process by a joint evaluation committee selected by the
director and consisting of representatives that have agriculture,
food security, local and regional food systems, business, and
economic development expertise. Projects funded through the food
and agriculture investment program will be required to have a grant
agreement that outlines milestones and activities that must be met
in order to receive a disbursement of funds. Projects must also
identify measurable project outcomes.
(5) The department shall include, in the agriculture
development annual report, a report on the food and agriculture
investment program for the previous fiscal year that includes a
listing of the grantees, award amounts, match funding, project
locations, and project outcomes.
(6) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for the food
and agriculture investment program are designated as a work project
appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds do not
lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for
expenditures for projects under this section until the projects
have been completed. The following is in compliance with section
451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to promote and expand the
Michigan food and agriculture sector, grow Michigan exports, and
increase food processing activities within the state.
(b) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(c) The estimated cost of this project is identified in the
appropriation line item.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


September 30, 2029.
(7) The department may expend money from the funds
appropriated in part 1 for the food and agriculture investment
program, including all of the following activities:
(a) Grants.
(b) Loans or loan guarantees.
(c) Infrastructure development.
(d) Other economic assistance.
(e) Program administration.
(f) Export assistance.
(8) The department shall expend no more than 5% from the funds
appropriated in part 1 for the food and agriculture investment
program for administrative purposes.
(9) In awarding grants under the food and agriculture
investment program, the department shall identify and encourage
applications from members of socially disadvantaged groups, women,
veterans, and beginning farmers and ranchers. In awarding grants
under the food and agriculture investment program, the department
must also prioritize Michigan-based small businesses, nonprofits,
and organizations promoting agriculture and food security
activities.
Sec. 603. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
Michigan local food, farm, and nutrition programs $5,000,000.00
must go to an organization that will assist and provide a financial
incentive to SNAP participants to provide a program to provide
access to fresh produce.
(2) The department shall work with the organization to ensure
that at least 80% of the funds allocated to the program are
directly used for the payments to participating vendors.
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


(3) The department shall work with the department of health
and human services to do all of the following:
(a) Notify recipients of food assistance program benefits that
food assistance program benefits can be accessed at many farmers
markets in this state with bridge cards.
(b) Notify recipients of food assistance program benefits
about the program and that it is administered by the organization.
Food assistance program recipients shall receive information about
the program.
(4) The department shall work with the organization to expand
access to the program in each of this state's counties with grocery
stores or farmers markets that meet the program's eligibility
requirements.
(5) On or before June 1, the department shall submit a report
on activities and outcomes of the program. The report must contain
all of the following:
(a) The counties in this state with participating program
vendors, the number of vendors by county, and the name and location
of vendors, as of May 1, 2025.
(b) The counties in this state with participating program
vendors, the number of vendors by county, and the name of location
of vendors, as of May 1, 2026. The report must highlight counties
and vendors added to the program since May 1, 2025.
(c) The number of individuals participating in the program, by
county.
Sec. 604. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
Michigan local food, farm, and nutrition programs funds must be
allocated for a program to support districts and other nonschool
sponsors in the purchase of locally grown fruits, vegetables, and
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


legumes, as described in this section.
(2) Funding under this section retained by the department for
administration must not exceed 5%. Funding under this section
retained by project partners for data collection, outreach, and
training must not exceed 2% for each partner.
(3) The department, in collaboration with the Michigan
department of education, shall develop and implement a competitive
grant program for districts and other nonschool sponsors to assist
in paying for the costs incurred by the district or other nonschool
sponsor to purchase or increase purchases of whole or minimally
processed fruits, vegetables, and legumes grown in this state. The
maximum amount that may be drawn down on a grant to a district or
other nonschool sponsor is based on the number of meals served by
the district during the previous school year under the Richard B.
Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, or meals
served by the other nonschool sponsor in the previous school year.
The department shall collaborate with the Michigan department of
education to provide training to newly participating schools and
other nonschool sponsors and electronic information on agriculture
in this state.
(4) The goals of the program under this section include
improving daily nutrition and eating habits for children through
the school and child care settings while investing in this state's
agricultural and related food business economy.
(5) A district or other nonschool sponsor that receives a
grant under this section shall use those funds for the costs
incurred by the district or the sponsor to do both of the
following:
(a) Purchase whole or minimally processed fruits, vegetables,
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


and legumes that meet both of the following requirements:
(i) For each fiscal year, were purchased for use in meals and
supportive activities as part of the United States Department of
Agriculture child nutrition programs provided between October 1 and
September 30 of that fiscal year.
(ii) Are grown in this state and, if minimally processed, are
also processed in this state.
(b) Pay for labor and food transportation of locally grown
fruits, vegetables, and legumes that directly support the
activities and goals of the program described in this section. The
amount paid under this subdivision must not exceed 25% of the grant
award.
(6) For Michigan-grown fruits, vegetables, and legumes that
satisfy the requirements of subsection (5), the department shall
make matching reimbursements in an amount not to exceed 10 cents
for every school meal that is served as part of the United States
Department of Agriculture's child nutrition programs.
(7) In awarding grants under this section, the department, in
collaboration with the Michigan department of education, shall work
in consultation with Michigan-based farm to school resource
organizations to develop scoring criteria that assess an
applicant's ability to procure Michigan-grown products, prepare and
menu Michigan-grown products, promote and market Michigan-grown
products, and submit letters of intent from districts or other
nonschool sponsors on plans for educational activities that promote
the goals of the program.
(8) The department, in collaboration with the Michigan
department of education, shall give preference to districts or
other nonschool sponsors that propose educational activities that
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


meet 1 or more of the following: promote healthy food activities;
have clear educational objectives; involve parents or the
community; connect to a school's or child care center's farm to
school or farm to early child care procurement activities; and
market and promote the program, leading to increased pupil
knowledge and consumption of Michigan-grown products. The
department, in collaboration with the Michigan department of
education, shall give stronger weighting and consideration to
applications with robust marketing and promotional activities.
(9) In awarding grants, the department, in collaboration with
the Michigan department of education, shall also consider all of
the following:
(a) The percentage of children who qualify for free or
reduced-price school meals under the Richard B. Russell National
School Lunch Act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j.
(b) The variety of school or child care center sizes and
geographic locations within the identified prosperity regions.
(c) Existing or planned collaboration between child care
sponsors, between districts, or with agricultural businesses and
essential local food infrastructure, such as farms, farm
cooperatives, processors, distributors, and local food hubs.
(10) As a condition of receiving a grant under this section, a
district or other nonschool sponsor shall provide, or direct its
vendors to provide, to the department copies of monthly receipts
that show the quantity of different Michigan-grown fruits,
vegetables, and legumes purchased, the amount of money spent on
each of these products, the name and Michigan location of the farm
that grew the products, and the methods or plans to market and
promote the program. The district or other nonschool sponsor also
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


shall provide to the department and the Michigan department of
education monthly United States Department of Agriculture child
nutrition reimbursable meal numbers and must retain monthly menus
noting when and how Michigan-grown products were used in meals. The
district or other nonschool sponsor and school or nonschool sponsor
food service director or directors also shall agree to respond to
brief online surveys and to provide a report that shows the
percentage relationship of Michigan spending compared to total food
spending. By not later than 60 days after the end of the period in
which funds under this section were received, and in which federal
child nutrition programs require submission of claims, each
district or each nonschool sponsor shall submit a report to the
department and the Michigan department of education on outcomes and
related measurements for economic development and children's
nutrition and readiness to learn. The report must include at least
both of the following:
(a) The extent to which farmers and related businesses,
including distributors and processors, saw an increase in market
opportunities and income generation through sales of Michigan or
local products to districts and other nonschool sponsors. All of
the following apply for purposes of this subdivision:
(i) The data used to determine the amount of this increase are
the total dollar amount of Michigan or local fruits, vegetables,
and legumes purchased by schools and other nonschool sponsors,
along with the number of different types of products purchased;
school and nonschool sponsor food purchasing trends identified
along with products that are of new and growing interest among food
service directors; the number of businesses impacted; and the
percentage of total food budget spent on Michigan-grown fruits,
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


vegetables, and legumes.
(ii) The district or other nonschool sponsor shall use
purchasing data collected for the program and surveys of school and
nonschool sponsor food service directors on the impact and success
of the program as the source for the data described in subparagraph
(i).
(b) The ability of pupils to access a variety of healthy
Michigan-grown foods through schools and other nonschool sponsor
centers and increase their consumption of those foods. All of the
following apply for purposes of this subdivision:
(i) The data used to determine whether this subdivision is met
are the number of pupils exposed to Michigan-grown fruits,
vegetables, and legumes at schools and nonschool sponsor centers;
the variety of products served; new items taste-tested or placed on
menus; and the increase in pupil willingness to try new local
healthy foods.
(ii) The district or other nonschool sponsor shall use
purchasing data collected for the project, meal count and
enrollment numbers, school menu calendars, and surveys of school
and nonschool sponsor food service directors as the source for the
data described in subparagraph (i).
(11) The department, in collaboration with the Michigan
department of education, shall compile the reports provided by
districts and other nonschool sponsors under subsection (10) into 1
legislative report. The department, in collaboration with the
Michigan department of education, shall provide this report not
later than April 1 of each fiscal year following the fiscal year
for which funding is allocated under this section to the house and
senate subcommittees responsible for school aid, the house and
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


senate fiscal agencies, and the state budget director.
(l2) Notwithstanding any other requirement, the department
shall make payments under this section on a schedule determined by
the department.
Sec. 605. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
Michigan local food, farm, and nutrition programs funds must be
allocated to the scratch cooking pilot program.
(2) A local education agency providing locally-produced
agriculture products for schools may submit an application to the
department for a grant under the pilot program. The application
must include both of the following:
(a) A needs assessment to evaluate equipment needs, equipment
utilization, procurement process, and workforce capabilities for
the pilot program.
(b) A strategic plan identifying all of the following:
(i) How the local education agency will use the grant funding.
(ii) How project activities will be monitored and evaluated.
(iii) All proposed costs with a clear explanation about how the
costs were determined.
(3) Grants shall be used by a local education agency to
promote scratch cooking, which may include any of the following:
(a) Implementing professional development and training related
to preparing, procuring, advertising, serving, and creating menus
of scratch-cooked meals that prioritize fresh, locally procured
items.
(b) Purchasing kitchen equipment or making infrastructure
modifications necessary for scratch cooking.
(c) Hiring of staff or third-party entities whose primary
focus is creating sustainable, actionable change within a school
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


food program to increase their scratch cooking that sustains beyond
the grant period.
(d) Providing technical assistance, pupil engagement, and
education related to scratch cooking, such as taste tests, recipe
development, and culinary education.
(e) Investing in K-12 software and technology systems for
procurement to support scratch cooking.
(f) Carrying out any additional activities to promote scratch
cooking that will help local education agencies meet or exceed
nutrition standards.
(4) In evaluating grant applications, the department shall
give priority to local education agencies that serve the greatest
proportion of students eligible for free or reduced-price lunch.
(5) Not later than 180 days after the expiration of the pilot
program, each local education agency that received a grant shall
submit a report to the department that compares the change at the
end of the grant period to the school year immediately preceding
the beginning of the grant period, including all of the following:
(a) Recipes prepared.
(b) Nutrient analysis information.
(c) Invoices or bid lists identifying the cost of equipment
needed for scratch cooking.
(d) The number of staff, type of staff, and time required to
prepare each meal.
(e) Salary and benefit rates for each food service employee
involved in food preparation of selected meals.
(f) Production record and meal counts.
(g) Free and reduced-price meal eligibility and average daily
lunch participation.
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


(h) Pre- and post-program scratch cooked menu analysis.
(i) Pre- and post-program local procured item analysis.
(j) Program cost savings.
(k) Any other information required by the department.
(6) Not later than 1 year following the expiration of the
pilot program, the department shall submit a report to the
chairpersons and minority chairpersons of committees and
subcommittees with jurisdictions over education and agriculture in
the house and senate that that includes at least the following
information:
(a) The number of and amount of grants.
(b) The names of and reports provided by participating local
education agencies.
(c) Recommendations on the continuation or expansion of the
pilot program.
(d) Any other information required by the department.
Sec. 606. (1) By not later than April 1, the department shall
report on the previous calendar year's activities of the
agriculture development bureau.
(2) The report described in subsection (1) must include the
following information on any grants awarded during the prior fiscal
year:
(a) The name of the grantee.
(b) The amount of the grant.
(c) The purpose of the grant, including measurable outcomes.
(d) Additional state, federal, private, or local funds
contributed to the grant project.
(e) The completion date of grant-funded activities.
(3) The report must include the following information on the
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


Michigan craft beverage council established under section 303 of
the Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1303:
(a) Council activities and accomplishments for the previous
fiscal year.
(b) Council expenditures for the previous fiscal year by
category of administration, industry support, research and
education grants, and promotion and consumer education.
(c) Grants awarded during the previous fiscal year and the
results of research grant projects completed during the previous
fiscal year.
(4) The report must identify grant recipients who are members
of socially disadvantaged groups, women, veterans, and beginning
farmers and ranchers.
Sec. 607. Unexpended industry support fund revenues at the end
of the fiscal year may be carried forward into the industry support
fund in the succeeding fiscal year and do not lapse to the general
fund.
Sec. 608. (1) The appropriations in part 1 for the qualified
forest program are for the purpose of increasing the knowledge of
nonindustrial private forestland owners regarding sound forest
management practices and increasing the amount of commercial timber
production from those lands.
(2) The department shall work in partnership with stakeholder
groups and other state and federal agencies to increase the active
management of nonindustrial private forestland to foster the growth
of this state's timber product industry.
Sec. 609. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the
department shall maintain coordination with the department of
treasury to improve the timely processing and issuance of tax
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


credits under section 36109 of the natural resources and
environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36109, for the
Michigan's farmland and open space preservation program under parts
361 and 362 of the natural resources and environmental protection
act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36101 to 324.36116 and 324.36201 to
324.36207. The improvement of timely processing and issuance, as
described in this section, includes, but is not limited to:
(a) Timely review of mailed applications and paperwork.
(b) Timely and proactive communications to applicants on the
status of their application.
(c) The provision of a clear and understood timeline for the
issuance of any tax credits.
Sec. 610. The department shall collaborate with the department
of labor and economic opportunity's office of rural prosperity on
the rural development fund grant program as part of the state's
coordinated strategy for achieving rural prosperity across the
state.

LABORATORY AND CONSUMER PROTECTION BUREAU
Sec. 701. The department shall report by April 1 on the
previous calendar year's activities of the laboratory bureau.
Sec. 702. No funds from the appropriations in part 1 may be used for
the purpose of consolidating state-run laboratories.

FAIRS AND EXPOSITIONS
Sec. 801. All appropriations from the agriculture equine
industry development fund must be spent on equine-related purposes.
No funds from the agriculture equine industry development fund may
be expended for non-equine-related purposes without prior approval
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


of the legislature.
Sec. 802. From the funds appropriated in part 1 from
agriculture equine industry development funds, available revenue
must be allocated in the following priority order:
(a) To support all administrative, contractual, and regulatory
costs incurred by the department and the Michigan gaming control
board.
(b) Any remaining funds collected through September 30, 2026,
after the obligations in subdivision (a) have been met, must be
prorated among the county fairs, supplements, breeders' awards, and
sire stakes awards to eligible race meeting licensees in accordance
with section 20 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL
431.320.
Sec. 803. From the funds appropriated in part 1 from purses
and supplements – fairs/licensed tracks, $720,000.00 may be spent
only if there is no standardbred race meeting in this state that is
licensed under the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL
431.301 to 431.336, by January 1.
Sec. 805. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for county
fairs, shows, and expositions, the department shall establish and
administer a county fairs, shows, and expositions grant program.
The program must have the following objectives:
(a) Assist in the financing of building improvements or other
capital improvements at county fairgrounds of this state.
(b) Provide financial support, promotion, prizes, and premiums
of equine, livestock, and other agricultural commodity expositions
in this state.
(2) The department shall award grants on a competitive basis
to county fairs or other organizations from the funds appropriated
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


in part 1 for county fairs, shows, and expositions grants. Grantees
will be required to provide a 50% cash match with grant awards and
identify measurable project outcomes. A county fair organization
that received a county fair capital improvement grant in the prior
fiscal year must not receive a grant from the appropriation in part
1.
(3) From the amount appropriated in part 1 for county fairs,
shows, and expositions, up to $25,000.00 must be expended for the
purpose of financial support, promotion, prizes, and premiums of
equine, livestock, and other agricultural commodity expositions and
festivals in this state.
(4) All fairs receiving grants under this section must provide
a report to the department on the financial impact resulting from
the capital improvement project on both fair and nonfair events.
These reports are due for 3 years immediately following the
completion of the capital improvement project.
(5) The department shall identify criteria, evaluate
applications, and provide recommendations to the director for final
approval of grant awards.
(6) The department may expend money from the funds
appropriated in part 1 for the county fairs, shows, and expositions
for administering the program.
(7) The unexpended portion of the appropriation in part 1 for
county fairs, shows, and expositions grants are designated as a
work project appropriation and any unencumbered or unallotted funds
do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are available for
expenditures for projects under this section until the projects
have been completed. The following is in compliance with section
451a(1) of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to support building
improvements or other capital improvements at county fairgrounds of
this state.
(b) All grants will be distributed in accordance with this
section and the grant guidelines published prior to the request for
proposals.
(c) The project will be accomplished by utilizing state
employees or contracts with service providers, or both.
(d) The estimated cost of the project is $250,000.00.
(e) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2028.
(8) The department shall provide a year-end report on the
county fairs, shows, and expositions grants no later than December
1, 2027 that includes a listing of the grantees, award amounts,
match funding, project outcomes, and department costs of grant
administration.

ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS
Sec. 901. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1 for
farmer-owned meat processor grants, the department shall establish
and administer a farmer-owned meat processor grant program. The
objective of the program is to expand and develop farmer-owned or
farmer-cooperative meat processing.
(2) The department shall award grants on a competitive basis
to farmer-owned or farmer-cooperative meat processors for funds to
assist processors in the financing of equipment, facilities, or
other capital improvements that would result in improvement or
expansion of meat processing.
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw


(3) The department shall identify criteria, evaluate
applications, and provide recommendations to the director for final
approval of grant awards.
(4) Grantees will be required to provide a 50% cash match with
grant awards and identify measurable project outcomes. A farmer-
owned or farmer-cooperative meat processor that received a grant
under this section must provide a report to the department on the
financial impact resulting from the receipt of a grant.
(5) The unexpended portion of the appropriation in part 1 for
farmer-owned or farmer-cooperative meat processors grants are
designated as a work project appropriation and any unencumbered or
unallotted funds do not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and are
available for expenditures for projects under this section until
the projects have been completed.
(6) The following is in compliance with section 451a(1) of the
management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a:
(a) The purpose of the project is to support enhancement at
farmer-owned or farmer-cooperative meat processors of this state.
(b) All grants will be distributed in accordance with this
section and the grant guidelines published prior to the request for
proposals.
(c) The estimated cost of the project is $4,000,000.00.
(d) The tentative completion date for the work project is
September 30, 2029.
(7) The department shall provide a year-end report on the
farmer-owned or farmer-cooperative meat processors grant program no
later than December 1, 2027 that includes a list of the grantees,
award amounts, match funding, project outcomes, and department
costs of grant administration.
Final Page
THS S06103'26 (S-3) 3k82mw